src/fst/stems/digits.lexc
!! !!!Digits and such expressions
!! Digit-strings are used in place of numerals. They inflect with colon, like
!! acronyms, and compound with hyphen only.

LEXICON DIGITS
!! Digits are constructed as several cyclic structures: integers, decimals or
!! roman numerals.
!! Zero alone works quite differently:
!!€gt-norm: Digit zero
!!€ 0: 0+Num+Sg+Nom
0    ARABIC_pirinen ;
0    DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
0    DIGITS_ROMANS   ;
     DIGITS_ONWARDS ;
     NUM_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NUM_PREFIXES
§+Use/Circ:§ ARABIC ;       ! §24
§§+Use/Circ:§§ ARABIC ;     ! §§24
§% +Use/Circ:§%  ARABIC ;   ! § 24
§§% +Use/Circ:§§%  ARABIC ; ! §§ 24
%-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+002D / regular hyphen
%‒+Use/Circ:%‒ ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2012 / figure dash
%–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2013 / en dash
%—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2014 / em dash
%―+Use/Circ:%― ARABIC ;     ! -24 U02015 / horizontal bar
%++Use/Circ:%+ ARABIC ;     ! <plus>24
%-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC ; ! - 24
%‒% +Use/Circ:%‒%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2012
%–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2013
%—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2014
%―% +Use/Circ:%―%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2015
%+% +Use/Circ:%+%  ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24
%*+Use/Circ:%* ARABIC ;     ! *24
%$+Use/Circ:%$ ARABIC ;     ! $24
%€+Use/Circ:%€ ARABIC ;     ! €24
%<+Use/Circ:%[%<%] ARABIC ; ! <24
%>+Use/Circ:%[%>%] ARABIC ; ! >24
s%.+Use/Circ:s%. ARABIC ;   ! s.24


LEXICON ARABIC_pirinen
!!€gt-norm: int digit loop
!!€ 13: 13+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 100: 100+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 0000005550000000: 0000005550000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom

< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] >   ARABICLOOP_pirinen ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOP_pirinen !!= __@CODE@__ essentially allows any number-sign combination, but is like the other lgs
+Use/Circ: DIGITS_ONWARDS ;
+Use/Circ: ARABIC ;
%-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC ;             ! 1-2    multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC ;             ! 1–2    multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC ;             ! 1—2    multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%.%-+Use/Circ:%.%- ARABIC ;         ! 1.-2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%.%–+Use/Circ:%.%– ARABIC ;         ! 1.–2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%.%—+Use/Circ:%.%— ARABIC ;         ! 1.—2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC ;         ! 1- 2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC ;         ! 1– 2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
%—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC ;         ! 1— 2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %-+Use/Circ:% %- ARABIC ;         ! 1 -2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %–+Use/Circ:% %– ARABIC ;         ! 1 –2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %—+Use/Circ:% %— ARABIC ;         ! 1 —2   multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %-% +Use/Circ:% %-%  ARABIC ;     ! 1 - 2  multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %–% +Use/Circ:% %–%  ARABIC ;     ! 1 – 2  multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %—% +Use/Circ:% %—%  ARABIC ;     ! 1 — 2  multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %-%-% +Use/Circ:% %-%-%  ARABIC ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %–%–% +Use/Circ:% %–%–%  ARABIC ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %—%—% +Use/Circ:% %—%—%  ARABIC ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers continuing as numbers
% %- # ;             ! 1 -    multipart numbers ending in hyphen
% %– # ;             ! 1 –    multipart numbers ending in hyphen
% %— # ;             ! 1 —    multipart numbers ending in hyphen
% %-%- # ;           ! 1 --   multipart numbers ending in hyphen
% %–%– # ;           ! 1 ––   multipart numbers ending in hyphen
% %—%— # ;           ! 1 ——   multipart numbers ending in hyphen
%.+Use/Circ:%. ARABIC ;
%,+Use/Circ:%, ARABIC ;
% +Use/Circ:%  ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500".
 +Use/Circ:   ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (initial char is alt-space)
/+Use/Circ:/ ARABIC ; ! 24/12
,%-+Num:,%- # ;   ! 10,-
,%–+Num:,%– # ;   ! 10,–
,%—+Num:,%— # ;   ! 10,—
%%+Num+Sg+Nom:%% # ;  ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
% %%+Num+Sg+Nom:% %% # ; ! We must analyse the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
+Num: RHyph ; ! Adding the hyphen for 3-ulotteinen


LEXICON DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP
!! The digit strings that end in 10 to 12 + 6n 0's are inflected alike:
!!€gt-norm: int digit milliard loop
!!€ 1000000000:   1000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 300000000000: 300000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 123456000000000000000000: 123456000000000000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
%0%0%0%0%0%0    DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP ;
+Num+Card:0    DIGITS_MILJARDI ;
+Num+Ord:0    DIGITS_KOLMAS ;

LEXICON DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP
!! The digit strings that end in 6 to 9 + 6n 0's are inflected alike:
!!€gt-norm: int digit million loop
!!€ 1000000:   1000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 300000000: 300000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 123456000000000000000: 123456000000000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
%0%0%0%0%0%0    DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP  ;
+Num+Card:0    DIGITS_MILJOONA ;
+Num+Ord:0    DIGITS_KOLMAS ;

LEXICON DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP
!! Decimal digit strings start with any number of digits 0 to 9, followed
!! by decimal separator comma. The decimal dot may be allowed as substandard
!! variant.
!!€gt-norm: decimal digit loop
!!€ 1,0: 1,0+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ 314,1: 314,1+Num+Sg+Nom
%0  DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
1   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
2   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
3   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
4   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
5   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
6   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
7   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
8   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
9   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP ;
,   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
.   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
.:, DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;


LEXICON DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL
!! The decimal digit strings end in any number of digits 0 to 9, inflected
!! along the last part.
!!€gt-norm: decimal digit loop more
!!€ 3,141: 3,141+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ 123,345: 123,345+Num+Sg+Nom
%0  DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
1   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
2   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
3   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
4   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
5   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
6   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
7   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
8   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
9   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL ;
%0+Num:%0   DIGITS_NOLLA ;
1+Num:1   DIGITS_YKSI  ;
2+Num:2   DIGITS_KAKSI ;
3+Num:3   DIGITS_KOLME ;
4+Num:4   DIGITS_NELJÄ ;
5+Num:5   DIGITS_VIISI ;
6+Num:6   DIGITS_KUUSI ;
7+Num:7   DIGITS_SEITSEMÄN ;
8+Num:8   DIGITS_KAHDEKSAN ;
9+Num:9   DIGITS_YHDEKSÄN  ;

LEXICON DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB
!! The decimal digit strings with dot may be allowed as sub-standard option
!! with respective analysis.
%0  DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
1   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
2   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
3   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
4   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
5   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
6   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
7   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
8   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
9   DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL_SUB ;
%0+Num+Err/Orth:%0   DIGITS_NOLLA ;
1+Num+Err/Orth:1   DIGITS_YKSI  ;
2+Num+Err/Orth:2   DIGITS_KAKSI ;
3+Num+Err/Orth:3   DIGITS_KOLME ;
4+Num+Err/Orth:4   DIGITS_NELJÄ ;
5+Num+Err/Orth:5   DIGITS_VIISI ;
6+Num+Err/Orth:6   DIGITS_KUUSI ;
7+Num+Err/Orth:7   DIGITS_SEITSEMÄN ;
8+Num+Err/Orth:8   DIGITS_KAHDEKSAN ;
9+Num+Err/Orth:9   DIGITS_YHDEKSÄN  ;

!! !!!Roman numerals with inflection
!! Roman numerals are composed the symbols M, D, C, L, X, V, I in ascending
!! scale and some combinations, they denote ordinal numbers and inflect like
!! ones.

!! !!Main lexicon for roman digits
!! This lexicon divides into four groups
LEXICON DIGITS_ROMANS
!!€gt-norm: roman numeral
!!€ MM: MM+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ MCXI: MCXI+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ CMXCIX: CMXCIX+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
0    DIGITS_ROMANS_THOUSANDS ;
0    DIGITS_ROMANS_HUNDREDS  ;
0    DIGITS_ROMANS_TENS      ;
0    DIGITS_ROMANS_ONES      ;

LEXICON DIGITS_ONWARDS !! __@CODE@__ is for entries not looping back 
1%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
1%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
1%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP    ;
1%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
1%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
1%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP    ;
